src/morphology/stems/conjunctions.lexc
!! !!!The Faroese conjunctions

LEXICON CCtag
 !!= __@LEXNAME@__ for the +CC tag.
 +CC: # ;

LEXICON Conjunction
 !!= __@LEXNAME@__ for the list of 10 or so conjunctions.
 antin CCtag ;
annaðhvørt CCtag ;
bæði CCtag ;
og CCtag ;
men  CCtag ;
ella CCtag ;
ti CCtag ;
eller CCtag ;
hvørki CCtag ;
eins% og CCtag ;
antil CCtag ;
jamen CCtag ;
